Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5681.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 36-4-18 of the General Laws in Chapter 36-4 entitled "Merit System"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
36-4-18. Competitive tests.
(a) The competitive tests shall be designed to determine fairly the capacity of the persons
examined to perform the duties of the positions in the classes for which the lists are prepared. The
personnel administrator may waive the need for competitive testing to help fill temporary and
emergency positions. The competitive tests shall be open to applicants who are residents of the
state of Rhode Island; provided, that the personnel administrator may admit to competitive tests for
technical, professional, or unusual positions residents of other states. Any resident denied
admission to an examination on the grounds of insufficient qualifications as established in the class
specifications involved may, within five (5) calendar days of the mailing of the notices, appeal in
writing to the administrator of adjudication for a hearing or review of the denial. On the basis of
the review or hearing, the administrator of adjudication may direct the personnel administrator to
permit the appellant to take the examination. The tests may take into consideration elements of
character, education, aptitude, experience, knowledge, skill, personality, physical fitness,
professional license, or specialized training, and other pertinent matters, and may be written, oral,
physical, or in the form of demonstration of skill, or any combination of these types. Public notice
of every test shall be given in the manner prescribed by the personnel rules.
(b) Exam studying and preparation materials shall be made available to all test takers. The

competitive test shall be available in Spanish and Portuguese.
(c) Persons having a legitimate and proper interest in examination questions used in
connection with any examination shall be freely allowed to inspect the questions, when all phases
of the examination in which the questions were used have been completed under such conditions
as shall be specified in the personnel rules. The final earned rating of each person competing in any
test shall be determined by the weighted average of the earned rating on all phases of the test
according to weights for each phase established by the personnel administrator in advance of the
giving of the tests and published as part of the announcement of the examination. However, the
personnel administrator may discontinue the examination process for any competitor when it has
been determined that the required minimum final earned rating cannot be attained. All persons
competing in any test shall be given written notice of their standing on any employment list or of
their failure to attain a place upon the list. The personnel administrator may as deemed appropriate
establish broadband examinations for a wide variety of entry and/or other levels of positions which
would not be ranked in the traditional manner. The examinations would be ranked only upon
certification to an appropriate vacancy and subject to conditions established in the personnel rules
and the provisions of §§ 36-4-4 and 36-4-7 shall not apply to any appointments which are in the
unclassified service. When an appropriate vacancy exists, the appointing authority will certify as
to the appropriate knowledge, skills, and abilities required for successful performance in a
particular position or positions. The personnel administrator will then proceed to rank all eligibles
who have qualified and possess the requisite knowledge, skills, and abilities.
SECTION 2. Chapter 36-4 of the General Laws entitled "Merit System" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
36-4-18.1. Personnel action requests.
The personnel administrator shall streamline the processing of personnel action requests to
reduce the time in which they are addressed.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001079
========
LC001079 - Page 2 of 3